Utah statutes.
53-11-107.   Licenses -- Classifications -- Prohibited acts.

(1)  Licenses under this chapter are issued in the classifications of:

(a)  bail enforcement agent;

(b)  bail recovery agent; or

(c)  bail recovery apprentice.

(2)  A person may not:

(a)  act or assume to act as, or represent himself to be, a licensee unless he is licensed under this chapter; or

(b)  falsely represent that he is employed by a licensee.

(3)  The commissioner shall issue licenses to applicants who qualify for them under this chapter.

(4)  A license issued under this chapter is not transferable or assignable.

